Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-1005
Review of rates and charges; petition; hearing; notice.

Within ninety days after July 1, 1994, a petition may be filed with the commission requesting a review of the established rates and charges. The petition shall be signed by at least twenty-five percent of the private water company's customers. Upon receipt of a petition, the commission shall set a time, place, and date for a public hearing to consider the established rates or charges. The hearing shall be held within ninety days after the filing of the petition pursuant to the rules and regulations of the commission. Notice of a hearing shall be given in the same manner as prescribed in subsection (2) of section 75-1007.

Laws 1994, LB 1002, § 5.